dev/transliterate/cyr-lat1710.twol
Alphabet 

	а:a б:b в:v г:g д:d е:e ж:j з:z к:k қ:q л:l м:m н:n о:o п:p р:r с:s т:t ф:f х:h һ:h ъ:0 ы:y ь:0 э:e ұ:u і:i
	ё:o ю:y я:a е:e ! letters that take iʼ
	ә:a ғ:g ө:o ү:u и:i й:i ң:n у:y ч:c ш:s ! letters that take ʼ
	щ:s ! shouldn't occur

	А:A Б:B В:V Г:G Д:D Е:E Ж:J З:Z К:K Қ:Q Л:L М:M Н:N О:O П:P Р:R С:S Т:T Ф:F Х:H Һ:H Ъ:0 Ы:Y Ь:0 Э:E Ұ:U І:I
	Ё:O Ю:Y Я:A Е:E ! letters that take iʼ
	Ә:A Ғ:G Ө:O Ү:U И:I Й:I Ң:N У:Y Ч:C Ш:S ! letters that take ʼ
	Щ:S ! shouldn't occur

	a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ʼ
	A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
   %{й%}:0 %{☭%}:0
	%{ʼ%}:ʼ ;



Sets

Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ч ш щ
	   Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ч Ш Щ ; 

Vow = е ё я а э и о ы ұ ү і ә ө
      Е Ё Я А Э И О Ы ұ ү і ә ө ;

Yot = е ё я ю
      Е Ё Я Ю ;

KazYot = ё я ю
         Ё Я Ю ;

FrontVow = е э и
           Е Э И ; ! non-first syllable only!

BackVow = а у о ы
          А У О Ы ; ! non-first syllable only!

Unspec = б в д ж з л й м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
         Б В Д Ж З Л й М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

Ambig = к г
        К Г ;

FrontAmbig = н л
             Н Л ;

Rules


"Insert iʼ for yot letters: i"
%{й%}:i <=> .#. _ %{ʼ%}: KazYot: ;
            Vow:  _ %{ʼ%}: Yot: ;
            Cns: [ ь:0 ] _ %{ʼ%}: Yot: ;
            Ambig: [ ъ:0 ] _ %{ʼ%}: Yot: ;

!@ Н:N а:a з:z а:a р:r б:b а:a {й}:i {ʼ}:ʼ е:e в:v

!"Don't insert iʼ except for yot letters: ʼ"
!%{ʼ%}:0 <=> _ ; 
!        except
!            .#. %{й%}: _ KazYot: ;
!            Vow: %{й%}: _ Yot: ;
!            Cns: [ ь:0 ] %{й%}: _ Yot: ;
!            Ambig: [ ъ:0 ] %{й%}: _ Yot: ;


!@ б:b {й}:0 {ʼ}:0 е:e й:i {ʼ}:ʼ б:b і:i т:t ш:s {ʼ}:ʼ і:i л:l і:i к:k т:t і:i ң:n {ʼ}:ʼ

!@ ү:u {ʼ}:ʼ ш:s {ʼ}:ʼ і:i н:n

!@ а:a ғ:g {ʼ}:ʼ а:a й:i {ʼ}:ʼ

!@ ү:u {ʼ}:ʼ й:i {ʼ}:ʼ д:d е:e
